test/src/gt-norm-yamls/to_be_checked/V-lex-der-pihted_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - pihteđ: # ML checked

    pihteđ+V+Inf: pihteđ
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: pihtuđ
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pihtuum
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pihtuuh
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pihtoo
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pihtojeen
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pihtuuvettee
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pihtuv
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pihtup
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pihtuuvetteđ
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pihtojeh
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pihtojim
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pihtojih
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pihtui
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pihtuim
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pihtuid
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pihtuin
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pihtuim
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pihtuid
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pihtojii
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pihtuuččim
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pihtuuččih
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pihtuuččij
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pihtuuččáim
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pihtuuččáid
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pihtuuččáin
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pihtuuččijm
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pihtuuččijd
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pihtuuččii
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pihtuužeem
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pihtuužeeh
E    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pihtuš
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pihtuužeen
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: pihtušvettee
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pihtuužává
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pihtuužep
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pihtušvetteđ
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pihtuužeh
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pihtuu
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pihtum
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pihtuuččii
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pihtuužii
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: pihtojeijee
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: pihtum
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: pihtum
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: pihtuumin
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: pihtuumist
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: pihtuumân
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: pihtuudijn
    pihteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: pihtuuhánnáá
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivtedâm
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pivtedah
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piivted
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pivtedeen
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: piivtedvettee
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pivtedává
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pivtedeh
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: piivted
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pivtedim
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pivtedij
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pivtedii
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pivtediččim
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pivtedičij
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pivtedižžeem
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pivtediš
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: piivted
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pivtedâm
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pivtedižžii
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: pivtedâm
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: piivtedhánnáá
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: pivtedem
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: piivtedmân
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: piivtedmin
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: piivtedmist
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: piivteddijn
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: piivteddijnân
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: piivteddijnâd
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: piivteddijnis
    pihteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: piivteddijn
    pihteđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pihtestâm
    pihteđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pihtettâm
    pihteđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivteškuáđám
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pihtâlâm
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piihtâl
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pihtâleen
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pihtâleh
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: piihtâl
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pihtâlim
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pihtâlij
    pihteđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pihtâlii
